Louisiana, session 2026, SB144.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:1052(5) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1052. Objects of the districts
The objects and purposes of the hospital service districts and the governing
bodies created pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter shall be:
* * *
(5) To cooperate with other public and private institutions, healthcare
facilities, and agencies engaged in providing hospital and other health services to
residents of the district.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-255 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 144